Missouri, session 2026, HB3362.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 394.080, RSMo, is repealed and seven new sections enacted in
lieu thereof, to be known as sections 91.015, 91.016, 247.222, 393.403, 393.1780, 394.080,
and 640.640, to read as follows:
91.015. A municipally owned utility shall develop a service tariff schedule
applicable to customers reasonably projected to have an annual peak demand of fifty
megawatts or more. The tariff schedule shall ensure that customers' rates reasonably
reflect the representative share of the costs incurred to serve the customers and prevent
other customer classes' rates from reflecting unjust or unreasonable costs arising from
service to customers with an annual peak demand of fifty megawatts or more.
91.016. A municipally owned utility shall develop a service tariff schedule
applicable to customers reasonably projected to exceed two million gallons per day or
eighty percent of the available capacity for that system per day. The tariff schedule
shall ensure that customers' rates reasonably reflect the representative share of the costs
incurred to serve the customers and prevent other customer classes' rates from
reflecting unjust or unreasonable costs arising from service to customers reasonably
projected to exceed either two million gallons per day or eighty percent of the available
capacity for that system per day.
247.222. A public water supply district shall develop a service tariff schedule
applicable to customers reasonably projected to exceed either two million gallons per
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3362 2
day or eighty percent of the available capacity for that system per day. The tariff
schedule shall ensure that customers' rates reasonably reflect the representative share of
the costs incurred to serve the customers and prevent other customer classes' rates from
reflecting unjust or unreasonable costs arising from service to customers with either two
million gallons per day or eighty percent of the available capacity for that system per
day.
393.403. A water corporation shall enter into a commission-approved contract
with customers whose water usage is reasonably projected to exceed either two million
gallons per day or eighty of the available capacity for that system per day. The contract
shall reasonably reflect the customer’s representative share of costs incurred to serve
the customer and prevent other customer classes' rates from reflecting any unjust or
unreasonable costs arising from service to such customer. The water corporation shall
submit such contracts for approval by the commission.
393.1780. 1. As used in this section, the term "large-load customer" shall mean:
(1) For an electrical provider with more than two hundred fifty thousand
customers, any electrical customer with an annual peak demand of one hundred
megawatts or more; and
(2) For an electrical provider with two hundred fifty thousand customers or
fewer, any electrical customer with an annual peak demand of more than fifty
megawatts but less than one hundred megawatts.
2. All electric providers shall establish a load-shedding plan with each large-load
customer for the protection or restoration of system operations. Load-shedding plans
shall prioritize continuation of service for critical facilities and residential services.
394.080. 1. A cooperative shall have power:
(1) To sue and be sued, in its corporate name;
(2) To have succession by its corporate name for the period stated in its articles of
incorporation or, if no period is stated in its articles of incorporation, to have such succession
perpetually;
(3) To adopt a corporate seal and alter the same at pleasure;
(4) Except as provided in section 386.800, to generate, manufacture, purchase,
acquire, accumulate and transmit electric energy, and to distribute, sell, supply, and dispose of
electric energy in rural areas to its members, to governmental agencies and political
subdivisions, and to other persons not in excess of ten percent of the number of its members;
provided, however, that where a cooperative has been transmitting, distributing, selling,
supplying or disposing of electric energy in a rural area which, by reason of increase in its
population, its inclusion in a city, town or village, or by reason of any other circumstance
ceases to be a rural area, such cooperative shall have the power to continue to transmit,

HB 3362 3
distribute, sell, supply or dispose of electric energy therein until such time as the municipality,
or the holder of a franchise to furnish electric energy in such municipality, may purchase the
physical property of such cooperative located within the boundaries of the municipality,
pursuant to law, or until such time as the municipality may grant a franchise in the manner
provided by law to a privately owned public utility to distribute electric power within the
municipality and such privately owned public utility shall purchase the physical property of
such cooperative located within the boundaries of the municipality. In case any of the parties
to such purchase, as herein provided, cannot agree upon the fair and reasonable price to be
paid for the physical property of such cooperative within the municipality, or if either party
refuses to negotiate for the sale of such property upon the request of the other, the fair and
reasonable value of such property for such purchase shall be fixed by the public service
commission upon application of any one or more of the interested parties;
(5) To make loans to persons to whom electric energy is or will be supplied by the
cooperative for the purpose of, and otherwise to assist such persons in, wiring their premises
and installing therein electric and plumbing fixtures, appliances, apparatus and equipment of
any and all kinds and character, and in connection therewith, to purchase, acquire, lease, sell,
distribute, install and repair such electric and plumbing fixtures, appliances, apparatus and
equipment, and to accept or otherwise acquire, and to sell, assign, transfer, endorse, pledge,
hypothecate and otherwise dispose of notes, bonds and other evidences of indebtedness and
any and all types of security therefor;
(6) To make loans to persons to whom electric energy is or will be supplied by the
cooperative for the purpose of, and otherwise to assist such persons in, constructing,
maintaining and operating electric refrigeration plants;
(7) To construct, purchase, take, receive, lease as lessee, or otherwise acquire, and to
own, hold, use, equip, maintain, and operate, and to sell, assign, transfer, convey, exchange,
lease as lessor, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise dispose of or encumber, electric transmission
and distribution lines or systems, electric generating plants, electric refrigeration plants, lands,
buildings, structures, dams, plants and equipment, and any and all kinds and classes of real or
personal property whatsoever, which shall be deemed necessary, convenient or appropriate to
accomplish the purpose for which the cooperative is organized. For the purposes of this
section, "electric transmission and distribution lines or systems" includes, but is not limited
to, cooperative-owned or cooperative subsidiary-owned copper and fiber optic cable, facilities
and technology, or any combination thereof, that carries, or has the capacity to carry, light
signals and data beyond or in addition to the light signals and data necessary for the
transmission and distribution of electricity;

HB 3362 4
(8) To purchase or otherwise acquire, and to own, hold, use and exercise and to sell,
assign, transfer, convey, mortgage, pledge, hypothecate, or otherwise dispose of or encumber,
franchises, rights, privileges, licenses, rights-of-way and easements;
(9) To borrow money and otherwise contract indebtedness, and to issue notes, bonds,
and other evidences of indebtedness therefor, and to secure the payment thereof by mortgage,
pledge, deed of trust, or any other encumbrance upon any or all of its then-owned or after-
acquired real or personal property, assets, franchises, revenues or income;
(10) To construct, maintain and operate electric transmission and distribution lines
along, upon, under and across all public thoroughfares, including without limitation, all roads,
highways, streets, alleys, bridges and causeways, and upon, under and across all publicly
owned lands, subject, however, to the requirements in respect of the use of such thoroughfares
and lands that are imposed by the respective authorities having jurisdiction thereof upon
corporations constructing or operating electric transmission and distribution lines or systems;
(11) To exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by the laws of
this state for the exercise of that power by corporations constructing or operating electric
transmission and distribution lines or systems. If a property owner prevails against a rural
electric cooperative or a cooperative subsidiary in a suit in trespass or in inverse
condemnation filed after August 28, 2018, the trespass shall be deemed permanent and the
actual damages awarded shall be the fair market value, which, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, shall always be greater than zero, as defined and calculated in subdivision
(1) of section 523.001 and determined in accordance with section 523.039. In no case filed
after August 28, 2018, may evidence of revenues or profits derived, nor the rental value of an
assembled communications corridor, be admissible in determining fair market value. Such
actual damages shall be fixed at the time of the initial trespass, shall not be deemed to
continue, accumulate, or accrue, and upon payment of damages the defendant shall be granted
a permanent easement for the trespass litigated. If a property owner prevails in such suits,
punitive damages may be assessed and the property owner may be awarded additional
compensation for any physical damages to the property directly resulting from the trespass, if
any, and reasonable attorneys' fees, costs, and expenses consistent with subsection 4 of
section 523.283;
(12) To conduct its business and exercise any or all of its powers within or without
this state;
(13) To adopt, amend and repeal bylaws; and
(14) To do and perform any and all other acts and things, and to have and exercise any
and all other powers which may be necessary, convenient or appropriate to accomplish the
purpose for which the cooperative is organized.

HB 3362 5
2. In addition to all other powers granted in this section, rural electric cooperatives
shall have the power to supply electric energy at retail after August 28, 1989, in cities, towns
and villages having a population in excess of fifteen hundred inhabitants under the following
conditions:
(1) The cooperative was the predominant supplier of retail electric energy within the
city, town or village at the time any official United States Census Bureau Decennial Census
Report declares the population of such city, town or village to be in excess of fifteen hundred
inhabitants;
(2) The city, town or village has granted to the cooperative a franchise to supply
electric energy within the city, town or village.
3. In addition, the cooperative shall provide, concurrent with its application to the
city, town or village for its initial franchise, written notice of its franchise application to all
other providers of electric energy at retail operating within such city, town or village.
4. The provisions of subsections 2 and 3 of this section shall in no way affect or
100 diminish the rights and duties of any city, town or village to grant franchises to electric
101 suppliers in the manner provided by law or of any electrical corporation authorized by law to
102 provide electric service at retail within such city, town or village.
103 5. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 2 of this section, after a public
104 hearing upon a complaint, the public service commission may order that service be provided
105 by another supplier if it finds that service from another supplier of electricity is in the public
106 interest for a reason other than rate differential. Nothing in this section shall be construed as
107 conferring upon the public service commission jurisdiction over the rates, financing,
108 accounting or management of any electric cooperative.
109 6. The powers conferred upon rural electric cooperatives under this section and
110 section 394.085 shall be subject to the provisions of section 416.031.
111 7. A cooperative shall develop a service tariff schedule applicable to customers
112 reasonably projected to have an annual peak demand of fifty megawatts or more. The
113 tariff schedule shall ensure that customers' rates reasonably reflect the representative
114 share of the costs incurred to serve the customers and prevent other customer classes'
115 rates from reflecting unjust or unreasonable costs arising from service to customers
116 with an annual peak demand of fifty megawatts or more.
640.640. 1. For the purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Applicant", any person applying for a major industrial water-user permit;
(2) "Beneficial uses", water uses that include, but are not limited to, domestic,
agricultural, industrial, recreational, and other legitimate beneficial uses;
(3) "Department", the Missouri department of natural resources;
(4) "Director", the director of the department of natural resources;

HB 3362 6
(5) "Major industrial water user permit", a permit issued by the department
granting the withdrawal of water from a water resource in the amount of two million
gallons or more per day;
(6) "Person", any individual, partnership, copartnership, firm, company, public
or private corporation, association, joint stock company, trust, estate, political
subdivision, water district, or any agency, board, department, or bureau of the
federal or any state government, or any other legal entity that is recognized by law as
the subject of rights and duties;
(7) "Water resources", any Missouri water source occurring on the surface, in
natural or artificial channels, lakes, reservoirs, or impoundments, or in subsurface
aquifers that are available or that may be made available.
2. In order to protect the access, use, and enjoyment of Missouri's water
resources, it shall be unlawful for any person to withdraw and use more than two
million gallons of water per day on average in a single month unless such person holds a
major industrial water user permit issued by the department, is a public water system
as defined in section 640.102, or such water is used for agricultural purposes.
3. The director shall review each major industrial water user permit application
and all supporting materials to ensure all the following conditions have been met prior
to approving a major industrial water user permit application:
(1) There are water resources available in the volumes and withdrawal rates
requested by the applicant;
(2) The volume and withdrawal rates requested by the applicant shall not exceed
eighty percent of the capacity of the water resource;
(3) The volume and withdrawal rates requested by the applicant shall not
interfere with existing and projected in-state beneficial uses; and
(4) The applicant has demonstrated that water in the amounts and rates
requested can feasibly be withdrawn.
4. Whenever a person applies for a major industrial water user permit or major
industrial water user permit renewal, the department shall send a written notice to the
county commission of the county where the water resource is located within thirty
business days after receiving the permit application.
5. (1) Within one hundred twenty days after the receipt of a complete
application, the director shall determine whether the applicant complied with the
provisions of subsection 3 of this section. The director shall, after making such
determination, hold a thirty-day public comment period regarding the director's
determination. Within sixty days after the comment period, the director shall approve
or deny the permit.

HB 3362 7
(2) To renew a valid major industrial water user permit, an applicant shall file a
renewal application for a major industrial water user permit with the department no
later than two hundred seventy-one days prior to the expiration of the existing permit.
The applicant and director shall follow the same procedures and timelines as required
for the issuance of a new major industrial water user permit under this section. The
director may impose additional conditions to address any substantial or material change
in factors under subsection 3 of this section or may deny a renewal application as
necessary to comply with this section based on any such substantial or material changes
in factors under subsection 3 of this section. If the director is in the process of reviewing
the renewal application before the final decision is made and the existing applicant's
major industrial water user permit expires, such applicant shall be able to operate
under the terms of the expired permit until a final decision is made by the director on
the renewal of such permit.
(3) In the absence of an appeal as provided under chapter 536, the decision of the
director shall be final.
6. A major industrial water user permit shall be in effect for five years from the
date of issuance. The permit holder shall annually report the water use volumes and
withdrawal rates to the department in a manner and on timelines determined by the
department. Such report shall be made available to the public on the department's
website.
7. The major industrial water user permit may be approved in whole or in part
by the director.
8. Any other major water user, as defined in section 256.400, may request the
department to reevaluate any existing major industrial water user permit using the
criteria under subsection 3 of this section. The department shall create a mechanism for
a major water user to submit a request for reevaluation and shall provide the major
water user with the director's findings within one hundred twenty days of the request
for reevaluation. After reevaluating the permit, the director shall impose additional
conditions necessary for the continued withdrawal if the director determines that the
existing permit is negatively impacting the requesting major water user's beneficial use
of his or her water resources. The director's decision to modify or to decline to modify
the conditions in an existing permit pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to
approval by the commission.
9. If the attorney general receives a complaint that provisions of this section have
been violated, or at the request of the department, the attorney general shall bring an
injunctive action or other appropriate action in the name of the people of the state to
enforce provisions of this section. Suit may be brought in Cole County, or in any county

HB 3362 8
where the defendant's principal place of business is located or where the withdrawal of
water occurred in violation of this section. Any member of the commission deemed to
have violated any provision of this section shall forfeit their office upon such finding of a
violation.
10. Whenever a state of emergency is declared by the governor under section
44.100 for all or any part of the state based on drought conditions, the department shall
reevaluate any existing major industrial water user permit. Any reevaluation
completed under this section shall use the criteria under subsection 3 of this section.
After reevaluation of the permit is complete, the department shall have the authority to
impose additional conditions or revoke the permit if necessary for the continued
withdrawal of water if the director determines that the existing permit negatively
impacts beneficial use of water resources.
11. If any provision of subsection 3 of this section or the application thereof to
anyone or to any circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of those sections and the
application of such provisions to others or other circumstances shall not be affected
thereby.
✔